Montana, session 2025, HB944.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Reporting. At each meeting of the general government budget
committee provided for in 5-12-501 following the completion of the 69th legislative session, the following
agencies shall provide a written report to the committee on the following subjects with the most recent
information from the previous 3 months prior to the reporting date to be received by the committee no later than
30 days before each meeting of the committee:
(1) the department of revenue on:
(a) the implementation of House Bill No. 56 if it is passed and approved;

(b) the status of a cannabis moratorium and the request for a position budgeted;
(c) (A) REPORT ON the status of hiring, including the status of new offices hiring in new, smaller
community offices; and
(d) (B) REPORT ON the status of unreported but taxable properties, including but not limited to new
construction;
(2) the consumer counsel on the status of its caseload contingency fund;
(3) the office of the commissioner on political practices REPORTING on the status of new positions
budgeted for lobby reporting;
(4) the department of labor and industry on:
(a) the implementation of House Bill No. 718 on educating incarcerated individuals if House Bill
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 944

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0944.3
No. 718 is passed and approved;
(b)(A) REPORTING ON the status of decreasing reliance on the general fund;
(c)(B) REPORT ON the status of the amount of square feet leased by the department; and
(d)(C) REPORT ON the status of releasing more positions budgeted;
(5) the department of administration on:
(a) REPORT ON the status AWARENESS of any contemplated lease changes statewide;
(b) REPORT ON the status of any KNOWN contemplated building acquisitions statewide; AND
(c) the status of procurement disclosure reports produced;
(d) vacancy rates in health care and benefit, risk management, and state financial services ;
(e) efforts to examine internal service rates, including but not limited to the workers' compensation
management rate ;
(f) updates to acc oun ts, fund balances, and interest earnings ;
(g) any procedural removing general fund dollars with fund switching and other tools where
appropriate sectionwide ; and
(h)(C) REPORT ON any department consolidations or split offs being contemplated;
(6) REPORT ON the state information technology services division on its efforts to consolidate and
reduce expenses for information technology;
(7) the department of commerce on:
(a) the status of fair housing and its e fforts to define the term;
(b) all grants made in the previous quarter, which includes identifying each grant's dollar amounts,
recipients, and source of funds ;
(c)(A) updated tourism tax revenue collections;
(d)(B) (A) REPORT ON advertising dollars spent, both on traditional methods and on social media,
for the last 10 5 years by year, by month, and by county, and an evaluation of the department's current
marketing and advertising budgets;
(e) safe and secure housing inspections update;
(f) updates on the Build America, Buy America Act ;
(g) analysis of consolidating the Montana heritage commission with the Montana historical society ;
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 944

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0944.3

(h)(C) examination of tax revenue generated by the b oard of horseracing ;
(i) possible consolidation of departments;
(j) evaluating how success is measured by the department ;
(k)(D) (B) REPORT FROM destination Montana, and to provide and TO explain the results of the
phase I planning from the $2.9 million United States development administration travel tourism and outdoor
recreation program grant received for tourism sector recovery from the covid-19 pandemic and on the status of
the implementation phase; and
(l)(E) (C) REPORT ON the updated status of any employees related to the American Rescue Plan
Act;
(8) the Montana board of housing on:
(a) new originated and new serviced loans for the previous 3 months to include the number of
transactions and total dollar amounts by mortgage insurance source, including the f ederal h ousing a
dministration and the United States department of veterans affairs ;
(b) the amount of positions budgeted for each mortgage function, including but not limited to
origination, processing, underwriting, and servicing;
(c) mortgage loans serviced by type to include aggregate dollar amounts, by year of inclusion into
a servicing portfolio, and latest delinquency numbers ; and
(d) an update on the implementation of House Bill No. 819 from the 2023 legislative session ;
(9)(8) THE MONTANA BOARD OF HOUSING TO REPORT WITH AN UPDATE OF THE IMPLEMENTATION OF HOUSE
BILL NO. 819 FROM THE 2023 LEGISLATIVE SESSION REGARDING FUNDS USED AND HOMES BUILT.
(9) the department of military affairs on:

(a) efforts REPORT ON IDEAS to restrain growth in general fund dollars spending; and
(b) an update on the multidomain operations training infrastructure status;
(10)(9) (10) REPORT FROM the office of budget and program planning on the use of any funds for
recruitment and retention, which must also identify the following:
(a) the position benefited from the authorization;
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – HB 944

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0944.3
(b) the agency for which the funds were expended; and
(c) the amount expended for the position benefited;
(11)(10) (11) REPORT FROM the governor's office on the results of the positions budgeted for the
governor’s efficiency initiative; and
(12)(11) (12) for all agencies that report to the general government budget committee, updates on
aged vacancy reports, attrition activity, and vacancy rates.

Section 2. Section 17-7-304, MCA, is amended to read:
"17-7-304. Disposal of unexpended appropriations. (1) All money appropriated for any specific
purpose except that appropriated for the university system units listed in subsection (2) and except as provided
in subsection (4) must, after the expiration of the time for which appropriated, revert to the several funds and
accounts from which originally appropriated. However, any unexpended balance in any specific appropriation
may be used for the years for which the appropriation was made or may be used to fund the provisions of 2-18-
1203 through 2-18-1205 and 19-2-706 in the succeeding year.
(2) Except as provided in 17-2-108 and subsection (3) of this section, all money appropriated for
the university of Montana campuses at Missoula, Butte, Dillon, and Helena and the Montana state university
campuses at Bozeman, Billings, Havre, and Great Falls, the agricultural experiment station with central offices
at Bozeman, the forest and conservation experiment station with central offices at Missoula, the cooperative
extension service with central offices at Bozeman, and the bureau of mines and geology with central offices in
Butte must, after the expiration of the time for which appropriated, revert to an account held by the board of
regents. The board of regents is authorized to maintain a fund balance and to use the funds held in this account
in accordance with a long-term plan for major and deferred maintenance expenditures and equipment or fixed
assets purchases prepared by the affected university system units and approved by the board of regents. The
affected university system units may, with the approval of the board of regents, modify the long-term plan at any
time to address changing needs and priorities. The board of regents shall communicate the plan to each
legislature, to the finance committee when requested by the committee, and to the office of budget and program
planning.
(3) Subsection (2) does not apply to reversions that are the result of a reduction in spending
- 4 - Authorized Print Version – HB 944

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0944.3
directed by the governor pursuant to 17-7-140. Any amount that is a result of a reduction in spending directed
by the governor must revert to the fund or account from which it was originally appropriated.
(4) (a) Subject to subsection (4)(b) and except as provided in subsection (4)(c ), after the end of a
fiscal year, 30% of the money appropriated to an agency for that year by the general appropriations act for
personal services, operating expenses, and equipment, by fund type, and remaining unexpended and
unencumbered at the end of the year may be reappropriated to be spent during the following 2 years for any
purpose, except for increases in pay, that is consistent with the goals and objectives of the agency. The dollar
amount of the 30% amount that may be carried forward and spent must be determined by the office of budget
and program planning.
(b) (i) Any portion of the 30% of the unexpended and unencumbered money referred to in
subsection (4)(a) that was appropriated to a legislative branch entity may be deposited in the account
established in 5-11-407.
(ii) After the end of a biennium, any portion of the unexpended and unencumbered money
appropriated for the operation of the preceding legislature in a separate appropriation act may be deposited in
the account established in 5-11-407. The approving authority shall determine the portion of the unexpended
and unencumbered money that is deposited in the account.
(iii) Any portion of the 30% of the unexpended and unencumbered money referred to in subsection
(4)(a) that was appropriated to the legislative audit division may be deposited in the account established in 5-
13-404.
(c) For each year of the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, all unexpended and unencumbered
funds for contracted services for the department of military affairs must revert to the general fund at the end of
that fiscal year.
(5) When the carryforward appropriation authority is established on the accounting system, and
prior to spending funds pursuant to subsection (4), an agency must report to the approving authority how those
funds will be spent in the following 2 years."

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Referrals to legislative auditor. The general government budget
committee may make referrals and recommendations to the legislative auditor.
- 5 - Authorized Print Version – HB 944

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0944.3

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Effective date. [This act] is effective July 1, 2025.

NEW SECTION. Section 4. Termination. (1) [Section 1] terminates September 15, 2026.
(2) [Section 2] terminates June 30, 2027.
- END -
- 6 - Authorized Print Version – HB 944